New York, session 2025-2026, S4906.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 642 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. A victim of an assault may choose to make their statement at their 4 workplace provided such workplace was the scene of the assault and is a 5 hospital, emergency medical facility, nursing home, or residential 6 health care facility as defined in section twenty-eight hundred one of 7 the public health law, or is a facility or hospital as defined in 8 section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law. Law enforcement officers shall 9 inform the victim of their right to have their statement be taken at 10 such workplace when officers have reason to believe the victim was 11 assaulted pursuant to section 120.05 of the penal law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09400-03-5